Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1107.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Adult-use Cannabis Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult-use cannabis." Cannabis legalized in this Commonwealth for personal use by an individual who is 21 years of age or older."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Farmer-grower." A person, including an individual, corporation, partnership, association, trust or other entity, or combination of persons, holding a farmer-grower permit from the department under this act."Grower/processor." As defined under the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act.Section 3. Program.(a) Establishment.--The Adult-use Cannabis Program is established within the department.(b) Administration and enforcement.--The department shall administer and enforce the program. In doing so, the department shall develop enforcement procedures, including announced and 20250HB1107PN1232 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unannounced inspections of facilities of farmer-growers and all records of the adult-use cannabis organizations.Section 4. Farmer-growers generally.(a) Authorization.--Subject to subsection (b), a farmer-grower may obtain seed and plant material from a grower/processor within this Commonwealth to grow, process or dispense adult-use cannabis in accordance with department regulations.(b) Limitations.--A farmer-grower may only grow, store or harvest adult-use cannabis in an area that:(1) is delineated to a single site at the address identified on the permit issued by the department;(2) does not exceed 10 acres of land;(3) is enclosed by a roof and walls on all sides;(4) includes locking systems and other security and surveillance features required by the department; and(5) is located within this Commonwealth.Section 5. Unlawful use of adult-use cannabis.A person may not grow adult-use cannabis unless the person has received a farmer-grower permit from the department under this act.Section 6. Application for farmer-grower permit.(a) Components.--An application for a farmer-grower permit to grow, process or dispense adult-use cannabis shall:(1) Be in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(2) Include verification of all principals, operators, financial backers or employees of the person applying for the farmer-grower permit.(b) Regions.--The department shall establish a minimum of 20250HB1107PN1232 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 three regions within this Commonwealth for the purpose of granting farmer-grower permits and enforcing this act.(c) Review and determination.--The department shall review each completed application for a farmer-grower permit, including a renewal of a farmer-grower permit, and determine whether or not to grant the permit.(d) Considerations.--In determining whether to grant a farmer-grower permit, the department shall consider the following:(1) Regional population.(2) Access to public transportation.(3) Any other factors that the department deems relevant.(e) Additional information.--If the department is not initially satisfied that the person applying for the farmer-grower permit should be issued a permit, the department shall notify the person in writing of the additional information or documentation that is required for further consideration of the application. Within 30 days of receipt of the notification, the person may submit additional information or documentation to the department.Section 7. Duties of farmer-growers.A farmer-grower, including a person applying for a farmer-grower permit, has a continuing duty to:(1) Report to the department any change in facts or circumstances reflected in the application for the farmer-grower permit or any newly discovered or occurring fact or circumstance which is required to be included in the application, including a change in control of the adult-use cannabis organization.20250HB1107PN1232 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Report to law enforcement, within 24 hours, any loss or theft of adult-use cannabis.(3) Submit to announced or unannounced inspections by the department of the facilities for growing, processing, dispensing or selling adult-use cannabis, including all records of the farmer-grower organization.Section 8. Fees.(a) Initial application fee.--A person applying for a farmer-grower permit shall pay an initial application fee in the amount of $2,500. The fee is nonrefundable.(b) Permit fee and period.--A person applying for a farmer-grower permit shall pay a farmer-grower permit fee in the amount of $2,500. The following apply:(1) The farmer-grower permit shall be valid for one year.(2) The person shall submit the farmer-grower permit fee at the time of submission of the application for the farmer-grower permit.(3) The fee under this subsection shall be returned if the department does not grant the farmer-grower permit.(c) Renewal fee and application.--If a farmer-grower chooses to renew a farmer-grower permit, the farmer-grower must pay a renewal fee in the amount of $2,500, which shall cover renewal for all locations. The following apply:(1) The renewal fee shall be returned if the department does not grant the renewal of the farmer-grower permit.(2) An application to renew a farmer-grower permit must be filed with the department not more than six months nor fewer than four months prior to the expiration of the farmer-grower permit.20250HB1107PN1232 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Payment.--Each fee under this section must be paid by certified check or money order.Section 9. Capital.Before issuing an initial farmer-grower permit under this act, the department shall verify that the person applying for the farmer-grower permit has enough capital, as determined by the department, which must be on deposit with a financial institution.Section 10. Limitations on farmer-growers and permits.The following limitations apply:(1) The department shall promulgate regulations initially limiting the number of farmer-grower permits granted under this act. The number of farmer-grower permits issued shall be determined by the department.(2) The department may not issue more than one farmer-grower permit to one person.(3) A farmer-grower may only provide adult-use cannabis to a grower/processor holding a valid permit under the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act.Section 11. Inventory tracking system.A farmer-grower must implement an inventory tracking system, which shall be accessible to the department. The inventory tracking system shall include tracking of all of the following:(1) The number of adult-use cannabis plants located on a site used for growing or cultivating adult-use cannabis.(2) The number of adult-use cannabis plants located on a site used for growing or cultivating adult-use cannabis that have been successfully cultivated for sale to a grower/processor.20250HB1107PN1232 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The number of adult-use cannabis plants located on a site used for growing or cultivating adult-use cannabis that are unfit for cultivation and marked for disposal as plant waste.(4) The plant waste resulting from the growth of adult-use cannabis and disposal methods, including the name and address of any disposal service.(5) A weekly log of each week's beginning inventory, acquisitions, amounts sold, disbursements, disposals and ending inventory. The inventory tracking system shall include prices paid and amounts collected from grower/processors.Section 12. Requirements regarding sites.Sites used for growing or cultivating adult-use cannabis must be certified, inspected and permitted by and registered with the department. The failure to permit inspection by the department shall be a violation of this act.Section 13. Reports.Within one year of the issuance of the first permit to a farmer-grower and every three months thereafter in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the following information shall be provided to the department, which shall compile the information and post it on the department's publicly accessible Internet website:(1) The amount of adult-use cannabis sold by the farmer-grower during each three-month period.(2) The price charged for each amount of adult-use cannabis sold by the farmer-grower, as determined by the department, and total amount of revenue received from the sales.Section 14. Storage, transportation and tracking.20250HB1107PN1232 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall develop regulations relating to the storage, transportation and tracking of adult-use cannabis among farmer-growers and of medical marijuana to ensure adequate security to guard against in-transit losses. The regulations shall provide for transporting adult-use cannabis to a farmer-grower.Section 15. Tax on adult-use cannabis.(a) Tax imposed.--A tax is imposed on the gross receipts of a grower/processor received from the sale of adult-use cannabis by a farmer-grower. The tax shall be at a rate of 1%. The tax shall be charged against and be paid by the grower/processor and shall not be added as a separate charge or line item on any sales slip, invoice, receipt or other statement or memorandum of the price paid by a dispensary, patient or caregiver.(b) Information.--A farmer-grower that sells adult-use cannabis shall provide to the Department of Revenue information required by the Department of Revenue.Section 16. Duties of advisory board.The advisory board established under section 1201 of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, shall include recommendations and findings as to whether to change, add or reduce the number of farmer-growers.Section 17. Zoning.A farmer-grower shall meet the same municipal zoning and land use requirements as other agricultural operations that are located in the same zoning district.Section 18. Notice of enactment.Upon enactment of a law that legalizes adult-use cannabis in this Commonwealth, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall transmit notice of the enactment to the Legislative Reference 20250HB1107PN1232 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 19. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 18 shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon publication of the notice under section 18.20250HB1107PN1232 - 9 - 12345678